Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.910

Additional authority—Effect as to other laws.

The authority of a public body to issue refunding bonds pursuant to this chapter is additional to any existing authority to issue such bonds and nothing in this chapter shall prevent the issuance of such bonds pursuant to any other law, and this chapter shall not be construed to amend any existing law authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds by a public body.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 138 s 14.]